Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,117
Judicial nominating commission; selection; provisions applicable.

Judicial nominating commissions for the office of judge of the separate juvenile court shall be selected in the manner and subject to all of the terms and provisions of law relating to judicial nominating commissions generally, as provided by the Constitution of Nebraska and the laws of this state.

Laws 1963, c. 244, § 5, p. 738;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-230.05;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 74.

For provisions of nominating commission, see sections 24-801 to 24-812.01.